Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 40 Control of Contagious Diseases
2-40-801. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Accredited veterinarian” means a veterinarian licensed by the Veterinary Medical Examining Board and approved by the United States Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service to perform functions required for state or cooperative state and federal animal disease control and eradication programs;

“Adjacent herds” means a group or groups of equidae sharing common pasture or having other direct contact with an affected herd or reactor animal and herds containing previous purchases from or exchanges with an affected herd. Herds separated by a distance of less than four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) are considered adjacent herds;

“Affected herd” means a herd of equidae that contains or has contained one or more animals infected with equine infectious anemia and that has not passed the required tests necessary for release from quarantine;

“Approved laboratory” means a laboratory which is approved by the United States Department of Agriculture and the State Veterinarian to conduct an official test for equine infectious anemia;

“Approved market” means a stockyard, livestock market, or other premises, approved by the commission where equidae are congregated for sale;

“Authorized agent” means a person who has been authorized by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission to act on its behalf in making investigations and inspections and performing other services or acts which have been defined by this subchapter;

“Certificate of veterinary inspection” means an official document issued by an accredited veterinarian at the point of origin of a shipment of equidae. It shall include:

The name, breed, registration number if any, implanted electronic identification transponder number if any, tattoo if any, brand if any, sex, age, color, and markings sufficient to positively identify each equidae listed on the form;

A record of a physical examination of each animal verifying freedom from visible evidence of any contagious, infectious, or communicable diseases and the results of an official test for equine infectious anemia, including the name of the approved laboratory, the case number, and the date of the most recent test results; and

The equidae temperature reading;

“Certified equine infectious anemia verifier” or “certified EIA verifier” means any certificate holder having completed the prescribed training course co-sponsored by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service, and the Arkansas Horse Council, Inc.;

“Commission” means the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission;

“Concentration point” means the gathering of one (1) or more equidae, for any purpose, at a single location, facility, or area whereby equidae will be within four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) from each other;

“Designated epidemiologist” means an experienced licensed epidemiologist who has been designated by the State Veterinarian to perform those functions necessary for the classification of equidae, based on the evaluation of test results and consideration of the animal and herd history as well as other epidemiologic factors including, but not limited to, weather conditions, number of vectors in the area, and concentration of animals;

“Epidemiologist investigation” means the process used by the designated epidemiologist to classify equidae;

“Equidae” means a family of perissodactyl ungulate mammals containing a single genus equus, which includes horses, asses, jacks, jennies, hennies, mules, donkeys, burros, ponies, and zebras;

“Equine activity” means:

Equine shows, fairs, competitions, performances, or parades that involve any or all breeds of equines and any of the equine disciplines, including, but not limited to, dressage, hunter and jumper horse shows, grand prix jumping, three-day events, combined training, rodeos, pulling, cutting, polo, steeplechasing, endurance trail riding and western games, and hunting;

Equine training and teaching activities;

Boarding equines;

Riding, inspecting, or evaluating an equine belonging to another, whether or not the owner has received some monetary consideration or other thing of value for the use of the equine or is permitting a prospective purchaser of equine to ride, inspect, or evaluate the equine; and

Rides, hunts, or other equine activities of any type, no matter how informal or impromptu;

“Equine infectious anemia”, “EIA”, or “EIAV” means the communicable infectious disease which affects equidae and is caused by the virus of equine infectious anemia;

“Exposed equidae” means equidae that have been in contact with, associated with, adjacent to, or within four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) of animals known to be equine infectious anemia reactors;

“Herd” means one (1) or more equidae of single or multiple ownership maintained on common ground or one (1) or more equidae under single or multiple ownership that are geographically separated but that can have an interchange or movement without regard to health status;

“Livestock dealer” means any person engaged in the business of buying or selling livestock including equidae in commerce on a commission basis, or any person registered and bonded under the provisions of the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, as amended, who buys or sells equidae.

The term “livestock dealer” does not include a farmer or rancher who buys or sells livestock or equidae in the ordinary course of his or her farming or ranching operation;

“Negative current equine infectious anemia test” or “negative current EIA test” means a negative response to an official equine infectious anemia test conducted by an approved laboratory within the past twelve (12) months;

“Neighboring herd” means one (1) or more equidae residing within four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) of another premise containing equidae and which other premise is owned, leased, or caretaken by different individuals, partnerships, or corporations. Temporary additions of equidae, regardless of length of time, are considered part of neighboring herds;

“Official equine infectious anemia test” or “official EIA test” means the agar gel immunodiffusion (AGID) test, also known as the “Coggins” test, the competitive enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (CELISA) test, the synthetic antigen enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (SA-ELISA) test and any other United States Department of Agriculture licensed tests approved by the commission;

“Participant” means any person, whether amateur or professional, who engages in an equine activity, whether or not a fee is paid to participate in the equine activity;

“Permit” or “permit for movement” means an official document issued by the commission, a representative of a Veterinary Services Endorsement Office, or an accredited veterinarian authorizing the movement of a reactor or exposed equidae to a quarantined holding facility, an approved slaughter facility, or approved quarantined premise.

The permit shall list the name, breed, registration number if any, tattoo if any, implanted electronic identification transponder number if any, brand if any, sex, age, color, and markings sufficient to positively identify each equidae listed on the form. The owner's name and address, origin and destination locations, and purpose of the movement shall also be recorded;

“Quarantine” means a written notice or order issued by the commission showing the boundaries of the area or premise affected, the equidae restricted, and the restrictions, if any;

“Quarantined holding facility” means a quarantined premise approved by the commission to handle reactors or exposed equidae;

“Reactor” means any equidae which reacts positively to an official equine infectious anemia test;

“Regulatory veterinarian” means a veterinarian employed by or acting as an agent for the commission; and

“Research facility” means any facility that meets or exceeds the standards and requirements set forth by United States Animal and Plant Health Inspection Services and the commission for equine infectious anemia research.

U.S. Code. The federal Packers and Stockyards Act referred to in this section is probably a reference to the Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921, codified as 7 U.S.C. § 181 et seq.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Agricultural Law, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 403.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 1; 2001, No. 540, § 1.

2-40-802. Penalties and fines.

Any person, firm, or corporation who violates any provision of this subchapter shall be subject to an administrative penalty.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 24; 2001, No. 540, § 2;
2017, No. 1011, § 66.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “be subject to an administrative penalty” for “upon conviction, be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and shall be ordered by the court to comply within seven (7) calendar days with all provisions of this subchapter and all regulations promulgated under this subchapter, or be guilty of contempt of court”.

2-40-803. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning rules, regulations, and orders, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 67. The section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 25; 2007, No. 827, § 8.

2-40-804. Testing requirements for domiciled equidae.

All equidae domiciled within the State of Arkansas shall be subjected to an official equine infectious anemia test every twelve (12) months.

An equidae is domiciled within the state when the equidae has been pastured, stabled, housed, or kept in any fashion in the state more than thirty (30) consecutive or unconsecutive days.

Written proof of a negative current official equine infectious anemia test shall be made available in the form of negative results from an approved laboratory upon request made by an authorized representative of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission or the owner, lessee, or caretaker of a neighboring herd.

Owners of horses domiciled within the state shall be responsible for maintaining a negative current official equine infectious anemia test on all horses that they own.

After January 1, 1998, failure to furnish proof of negative current official equine infectious anemia test to an authorized agent of the commission may result in quarantine and penalties prescribed by § 2-40-826 and §2-40-827 [repealed].

An owner of a neighboring herd, whether of single or multiple ownership, shall have the right to know if any equine within four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) are untested, exposed, or reactor animals.

When any equidae is examined or treated by an accredited veterinarian, the owner or caretaker must present to the veterinarian written proof of a negative current official equine infectious anemia test.

If no official equine infectious anemia test results are available, the accredited veterinarian may draw an official sample for equine infectious anemia as part of the examination or treatment, at the owner's expense.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 2.

2-40-805. Equidae identification requirements.

All equidae domiciled within Arkansas and over the age of six (6) months or weaned from a mare shall be positively identified on the official equine infectious anemia test form by an accredited veterinarian or an agent of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission by means of distinctive markings, color patterns, previous brand, previous tattoo, previously implanted electronic transponder number, permanent scars, other blemishes, cowlicks, whorls, lip tattoo, hot brand or freeze brand before an equine infectious anemia test.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 3.

2-40-806. Authority to require test.

Any equidae which have been within four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) of a reactor shall be subject to testing by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, the State Veterinarian, or their agents if the exposure to the reactor occurred no more than thirty (30) days before the testing of the reactor.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 4.

2-40-807. Personnel authorized to collect blood samples.

All samples collected from equidae for equine infectious anemia testing shall be collected by an accredited veterinarian, the State Veterinarian, or other Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission-authorized personnel.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 5.

2-40-808. Submission of sample and test charts.

All blood samples submitted for official equine infectious anemia tests must be accompanied by a properly completed VS Form 10-11 (Equine Infectious Anemia Laboratory Test Form) or other form prescribed by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.

Proof of a negative equine infectious anemia test may be demonstrated through presentation of:

The original test record document;

An official electronic copy, as defined by the commission;and

Other forms as may be prescribed by the commission.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by No. 716 rewrote (b).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1011 removed the (a) designation and deleted former (b).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 6; 2017, No. 716, § 1; 2017, No. 1011, § 68.

2-40-809. Requirements for Arkansas-approved equine infectious anemia testing laboratories.

No person, firm, or corporation shall initiate operation of an equine infectious anemia testing laboratory without first obtaining approval from the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 7.

2-40-810. Classification of equidae tested.

All equidae tested shall be classified as either negative or reactor.

Reactors may be retested at the owner's expense provided the owner or the owner's agent initiates a retest request to the State Veterinarian not more than five (5) working days after the receipt of the test results by the owner or the owner's agent.

All retest samples shall be collected by the same accredited veterinarian who conducted the original test or an alternate accredited veterinarian appointed by the State Veterinarian, and submitted to an approved laboratory within twenty (20) days after the receipt by the owner or the owner's agent of the first positive test.

The veterinarian collecting the retest sample shall be provided documentation that the animal being retested is the one shown positive on the initial test.

All reactors shall be held in isolation, under quarantine, while awaiting the retest results.

All other equidae on the premises shall be held under quarantine while awaiting the retest results.

Retest results shall be the official results unless there are conflicting tests.

If there are conflicting tests, a third test shall be conducted in the presence of an authorized agent of the commission or by an authorized agent of the commission.

The sample will be sent to the commission's diagnostic laboratory. Costs will be borne by the state unless an accredited veterinarian draws the sample, which will be paid for by the owner.

Results of two (2) out of three (3) tests will determine classification.

Defendant lacked standing to challenge the vagueness of subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section, requiring owners to permit their horses to a research facility if the animal tested positive for equine infectious anemia, where defendant never attempted to “permit” her infected horse. Ross v. State, 347 Ark. 334, 64 S.W.3d 272 (2002).

The original test record document;

The negative equine infectious anemia test to have been conducted at an approved laboratory within the previous twelve (12) months, rather than the previous six (6) months;

Any negative equine infectious anemia test required to be conducted within the last six (6) months to be conducted after the race and after title and risk of loss have passed to the buyer; or

That the requirements of both subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) of this section be met.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added (b)(3), and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment by No. 716 rewrote (a)(1)(B).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1011 deleted (a)(1)(B) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

Be “S” branded and consigned to slaughter before receiving test results; or

Be allowed to return to their premises of origin before unloading and before consignment and be quarantined to the premises of origin until tested negative. The equidae must be tested within thirty (30) days.

Letters must be one foot (1') high.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by No. 716 rewrote (b).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1011 deleted “or an authorized agent of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission at the Market” following “veterinarian” in (a)(2); and deleted former (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by No. 716 rewrote (b).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1011 repealed (b).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Agricultural Law, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 403.

It is the market owner's responsibility to make sure that all equines sold meet these requirements.

All equidae moving within the state to equidae exhibitions, including, but not limited to, fairs, livestock shows, breed association shows, rodeos, trail rides, parades, team pennings, team ropings, racetracks, or other equidae concentration points shall be accompanied by a record of a negative current official equine infectious anemia test within the past twelve (12) months.

Proof of a negative equine infectious anemia test may be demonstrated through presentation of:

Any individual, club, organization, or association conducting an equine activity shall arrange for a certified equine infectious anemia verifier to be present at the event to verify that each of the equidae is accompanied by a record of a negative current official equine infectious anemia test if:

Any show or event within the state may require any additional tests or additional requirements deemed necessary.

All equidae entering Arkansas must be accompanied by a record of a negative current official equine infectious anemia test.

All equidae must also be accompanied by a certificate of veterinary inspection, listing information from a record of a negative official equine infectious anemia test, the name and address of the consignor and consignee, the number of animals in the shipment, and a description which accurately identifies each animal.

A foal under six (6) months old accompanied by a negative dam does not have to be tested for equine infectious anemia.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 8.

2-40-811. Reporting of test results.

It is the responsibility of the approved laboratory to notify the State Veterinarian's office and the individual submitting the sample for testing within twenty-four (24) hours after classifying an equidae as a reactor.

It is the responsibility of the individual collecting the test sample to notify the reactor's owner or the owner's agent of the results of all positive tests within forty-eight (48) hours after classification and to notify the animal's owner or the owner's agent of the quarantine resulting from positive test results.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 9.

2-40-812. Quarantines.

(1)All reactors shall be quarantined by an authorized agent of the commission to the premises of origin or other premises designated by the owner and approved by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.

The quarantine shall restrict the reactors, all other equidae on the premises, and all equidae epidemiologically determined by the commission to have been exposed to a reactor.

All equidae on affected premises shall be isolated at least four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) away from all equidae on adjacent premises and at least four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) from any public road.

It is the responsibility of the owner of reactors to maintain those animals in isolation at least four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) away from any public road and all other equidae.

The quarantine may be released by an authorized agent of the commission after all quarantined equidae in the affected herd test negative to an official equine infectious anemia test not less than sixty (60) days nor more than eighty (80) days following the identification and removal of the last reactor, or as determined by the designated epidemiologist.

No equidae held under quarantine may be moved or released until a written permit or quarantine release, signed by an authorized agent, has been executed.

All adjacent herds, neighboring herds, and other exposed equine, so deemed by epidemiological investigation, will be quarantined by written report by an authorized agent.

A deviation in testing requirements for a quarantine is acceptable when made by the designated epidemiologist.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 10.

2-40-813. Quarantining reactors.

(1)(A)With the exception of the equine stabled at a racetrack regulated by the Arkansas Racing Commission, all reactors shall be quarantined to the owner's premises or an approved quarantine holding facility and shall be destroyed or sold for immediate slaughter or permitted to a research facility within twenty (20) days after the date of the last official positive equine infectious anemia test.

If the equidae is destroyed or dies of natural causes within the twenty-day period, verification of the destruction or death by written and signed statement from an accredited veterinarian or an authorized agent of the commission must be furnished to the office of the State Veterinarian.

If sold for slaughter, the equidae may be moved from the owner's premises to an approved market or to an approved slaughter facility, provided that the equidae are accompanied by a permit for movement.

The owner or trainer of reactors stabled at a racetrack regulated by the commission shall be notified immediately by the testing veterinarian, racetrack officials, or by commission personnel and the reactors shall be removed from the racetrack premises immediately.

(1)(A)Upon request by the owner, any female reactor that is at least two hundred seventy (270) days pregnant or has a nursing foal less than four (4) months of age, as verified by an accredited veterinarian or an agent of the commission, at her side may be quarantined to the owner's premises and shall be kept at least four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) away from any other equidae.

The reactor shall be identified with a “71A” brand, or other brand prescribed by the commission, at least two inches (2") in height on the left shoulder or left side of the neck.

The female reactor may remain in quarantine until her foal dies or reaches an age of four (4) months, at which time the reactor shall either be destroyed, shipped by permit to an approved quarantined holding facility, or sold for immediate slaughter within twenty (20) days.

If the equidae is destroyed or dies from natural causes, verification of destruction by a written and signed statement must be furnished to the office of the State Veterinarian by an accredited veterinarian or an agent of the commission.

If sold for slaughter, the reactor may be moved from the owner's premises to an approved market or to an approved slaughter facility provided that the reactor is accompanied by a permit for movement.

Any foal kept in quarantine with its equine infectious anemia positive dam shall be officially tested for equine infectious anemia at the owner's expense not less than sixty (60) days nor more than eighty (80) days after it is weaned. Foals nursing positive mares must be weaned at four (4) months of age.

(A)Any equidae which tested positive to the official equine infectious anemia test before August 1, 1997, shall be quarantined to the owner's premises and kept at least four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) away from any other equidae or public road.

The reactor shall be identified with a “71A” brand, or other brand prescribed by the commission, at least two (2) inches in height on the left shoulder or left side of neck.

If the reactor is sold, it must be sold for slaughter and a VS Form 1-27 or permit must be issued by commission personnel to move the reactor from the owner's premises to slaughter.

Ownership of reactors may not be changed except for slaughter.

If the reactor is destroyed or dies, verification of destruction or death by written and signed statement must be furnished to the office of the State Veterinarian, certified by an accredited veterinarian, or an agent of the commission.

Any reactor found in violation of quarantine shall be ordered sold for slaughter or destroyed within twenty (20) days, and the owner or caretaker will be subject to prosecution for noncompliance.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 11.

2-40-814. Positive reactors at official racetracks.

All equines stabled at a racetrack regulated by the Arkansas Racing Commission which test positive to the official equine infectious anemia test shall be immediately removed from the racetrack, shall be quarantined to the premises to which they are moved, and shall be destroyed, branded by authorized commission personnel, sold for immediate slaughter, or by permit shipped to an approved quarantined holding facility within twenty (20) days after the date of the last official positive equine infectious anemia test.

If the equine is destroyed or dies of natural causes within the twenty (20) days, a written and signed statement by an accredited veterinarian or an agent of the commission must be furnished to the office of the State Veterinarian.

If the equine is sold for slaughter, the equine may be moved from the owner's premises to an approved market or to an approved slaughter facility provided that the equine is accompanied by a permit for movement.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 12.

2-40-815. Testing requirements in affected herds.

All equidae determined to have been on the same premises as a reactor at the time the reactor was bled shall be tested by an accredited veterinarian or an authorized agent of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission at the owner's expense sixty to eighty (60-80) days after the reactor's last positive test result.

A foal less than four (4) months of age nursing a negative tested dam is exempt from testing.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 13.

2-40-816. Movement of reactors and exposed animals.

All reactors and exposed equidae must be accompanied by a permit for movement when moved from their quarantined premises.

All reactors must be branded before moving interstate.

Movement of a reactor and exposed equidae must be direct to an approved slaughter facility or a quarantined holding facility for movement to an approved slaughter facility.

(1)Any other move such as a change in location of a reactor or exposed equidae to an alternate quarantined premise must be approved in advance following an epidemiological investigation by the State Veterinarian or other designated Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission personnel.

The movement must also be accompanied by a permit for movement.

If a change in destination becomes necessary, a new permit must be issued by commission-authorized personnel or the regulatory veterinarian.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 14.

2-40-817. Requirements for quarantined holding facilities.

(1)A person desiring to operate a quarantined holding facility must file an application for approval of the facility on forms provided by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.

The facility must have an area where equidae testing positive to an official equine infectious anemia test and exposed equidae are kept, and where the equidae are isolated and confined at least four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) from all other equidae at all times.

The facility must be approved by the commission under an inspection of the premises before the issuance of the license.

Failure to maintain the reactors and exposed equidae in confinement and isolation at least four hundred forty yards (440 yds.) from all other equidae at all times is a violation of this subchapter.

(1)All equidae held in a quarantined holding facility must be shipped directly to an approved slaughter facility without diversion.

An animal moved from a quarantined holding facility may not go through any livestock auction facility before shipment to slaughter.

All movements from a quarantined holding facility must be accompanied by a permit for movement.

All equidae entering or within an approved quarantine holding facility shall be branded or show evidence of an “S” brand on the top of the left hip or a “71A” brand or other brand prescribed by the commission on the left shoulder or neck, not less than two inches (2") in height.

No equidae may be held over twenty (20) days.

A quarantine pen must be clearly identified by a sign or paint using the word “Quarantined” on all sides. Letters of the sign must be a minimum of one foot (1') in height.

Failure to comply with this subchapter shall be cause for cancellation of approval by the commission.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 15.

2-40-818. Fictitious names and erroneous information.

Test charts, permits, and other official forms must be completed in the name of the owner or the person responsible for the equidae.

No livestock auction facility operator or veterinarian may be held responsible for recording erroneous information provided by an owner, buyer, or seller.

The individual providing the erroneous or fictitious information shall be deemed to have violated this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 16.

2-40-819. Testing requirements for change of ownership.

(1)(A)All equidae which are sold, bartered, traded, given free of charge, or offered for sale, or any horses otherwise exchanged for any reason within Arkansas except at approved markets must be accompanied by a record of a negative equine infectious anemia test conducted at an approved laboratory within the previous six (6) months.

Proof of a negative equine infectious anemia test may be demonstrated through presentation of:

An official electronic copy, as defined by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission; and

Other forms as may be prescribed by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.

A foal less than six (6) months of age is exempt from the testing requirements if the foal is accompanied by, nursing, and included in change of ownership with a negative tested mare.

A foal sold separately is required to have a negative current official equine infectious anemia test.

On all private sales, trades, or barters, that is, any sale other than through an approved market, both the buyer and seller are equally and individually responsible for meeting the equine infectious anemia testing requirements before the sale or change of ownership.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, with respect to a horse claimed in a claiming race run at a licensed racetrack regulated by the Arkansas Racing Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission may require:

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 17; 1999, No. 10, § 3; 2007, No. 827, § 9; 2017, No. 716, § 2; 2017, No. 1011, § 69.

2-40-820. Movement of equidae through approved market.

All equidae offered for sale or sold at approved markets must:

Be accompanied by written proof of a negative equine infectious anemia test conducted within the last six (6) months;

Have a blood sample collected by an accredited veterinarian and test negative to an official equine infectious anemia test performed by an approved laboratory before the animal leaves the market;

Have a blood sample collected by an accredited veterinarian or an authorized agent of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission at the market and be quarantined to the market until negative results are received from an approved laboratory;

Proof of a negative equine infectious anemia test may be demonstrated through presentation of:

The original test record document;

An official electronic copy, as defined by the commission; and

Other forms as may be prescribed by the commission.

A foal less than six (6) months of age sold with and nursing a negative-tested mare is exempt from the testing requirements of this subchapter.

(1)A known reactor or known exposed equidae shall not be consigned for sale at an approved market unless permitted by authorized commission personnel.

An animal which is found to be a reactor or exposed through testing conducted at an approved market must be maintained in a quarantine pen and isolated from all other equidae in the sale facility.

(A)The quarantine pen must be clearly identified by sign or paint using the word “Quarantined” on all sides.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 18; 2017, No. 716, § 3; 2017, No. 1011, § 70.

2-40-821. Requirements of equidae participating in equine activities.

The original test record document;

An official electronic copy, as defined by the ArkansasLivestock and Poultry Commission; and

Other forms as may be prescribed by the commission.

The event charges a fee of any kind, including an entry fee, a gate fee, a membership fee, a registration fee, a user fee, a camping fee, or a grounds fee;

The event provides prize money, trophies, plaques, ribbons, points, or awards of any kind, including jackpot and benefits; or

The event causes a concentration of more than fifty (50) equidae.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 19; 2001, No. 540, § 3; 2017, No. 716, § 4; 2017, No. 1011, § 71.

2-40-822. General requirements for equidae entering Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 20.

2-40-823. Requirements of equidae moving within the state.

All equidae moving within the state for any reason shall be accompanied by a negative current official equine infectious anemia test.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 21.

2-40-824. Entry requirements to a veterinarian's clinic for care or treatment.

Equidae may enter Arkansas when consigned directly to a veterinary hospital or clinic for treatment or for usual veterinary procedures when accompanied by an owner or shipper permit.

Following release by the veterinarian, equidae must be returned immediately to the state of origin by the most direct route or meet testing requirements for additional movements.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the expiration of this subchapter, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 759, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 27.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning reports of violations, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 72. The section was derived from Acts 1999, No. 759, § 2.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 22.

2-40-825. Entry requirements to an approved slaughter facility.

All equidae consigned to an approved slaughter facility must be properly and individually identified and accompanied by a waybill, bill of lading, permit, or certificate of veterinary inspection.

A known reactor must be branded, and a known exposed animal must be properly identified and accompanied by a permit.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 23.

2-40-826. Equine infectious anemia services.

In order to fund or partially fund the Equine Infectious Anemia Control and Eradication Program, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission may, by appropriately adopted administrative rules, design and maintain a fee structure for the purpose of defraying the cost of services performed.

The fees collected shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues and shall be credited to the Livestock and Poultry Equine Infectious Anemia Control Fund created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 26.

2-40-827. [Repealed.]

2-40-829. Research facility certification required.

Any research facility in this state which contains equidae infected with equine infectious anemia or any reactor equidae shall be certified by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission and shall be so maintained as to prevent the infection of any other equidae, whether at or outside the research facility.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 540, § 4.

Subchapter 9

— Tick Control Program

2-40-901 — 2-40-906. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning Tick Control Program, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 73. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

2-40-901. Acts 1973, No. 306, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-452.

2-40-903. Acts 1973, No. 306, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-453, 78-454.

2-40-905. Acts 1951, No. 396, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-420.

Subchapter 10

— Cattle Quarantine Lines

2-40-1001 — 2-40-1006. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning cattle quarantine lines, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 74. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

2-40-1001. Acts 1925, No. 95, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 383; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-507; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 404.

2-40-1003. Acts 1899, No. 45, §§ 1, 2, p. 71; 1901, No. 13, § 1, p. 26; 1901, No. 59, § 1, p. 106; 1907, No. 104, § 1, p. 266; 1907, No. 409, §§ 10, 15, p. 1043; 1909, No. 255, § 1, p. 762; C. & M. Dig., §§ 357, 362, 378, 379; Pope's Dig., §§ 382, 387, 402, 403; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-408, 78-505, 78-506, 78-510.

2-40-1005. Acts 1899, No. 45, §§ 4-6, p. 71; C. & M. Dig., §§ 381-383; Pope's Dig., §§ 405-407; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-514 — 78-516.

Subchapter 11

— Rabies

2-40-1101. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning entire county as infested area, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 75. The section was derived from Acts 1961, No. 196, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-436.

Subchapter 12

— Pseudorabies Control and Eradication Program

Effective Dates. Acts 1991, No. 1105, § 31: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.